Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 40 Crime Victims Compensation

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Victim Compensation and Restitution: Legislative Alternatives,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurisdiction or power of juvenile court to order parent of juvenile to make restitution for juvenile's offense, 66 ALR4th 985.

81A C.J.S. States § 195.